lt-LT: Smūgių skydo forma: Lenktas; Dviguba letenėlė; Plokščias / stačiakampis; Ovalus; Letenėlė; Apvalus; Kvadratinis; Lagamino formos; Antkapio formos; Kita
da: Form på slagpude: Buet; Dobbelt paddle; Flad/rektangulær; Oval; Paddle; Rund; Firkantet; Kuffert; Tombstone; Andet
de: Form des Schlagpolsters: Gebogen; Doppelpratze; Flach/Rechteckig; Oval; Pratze; Rund; Quadratisch; Kofferform; Grabstein; Andere
th: Shapesทรงโล่โจมตี: ทรงโค้ง; เป้าล่อเตะแบบคู่; ทรงแบน/สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงรี; เป้าล่อเตะแบบเดี่ยว; ทรงกลม; ทรงสี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; ทรงกระเป๋าเดินทาง; ทรงป้ายหลุมศพ; อื่นๆ
pl: Materiał tarczy treningowej: Wygięta; Podwójna packa; Płaska / prostokątna; Owalna; Packa; Okrągła; Kwadratowa; Walizkowa; Tombstone; Inna
it: Forma dello scudo da colpi: Curvo; A doppia paletta; Piatto/rettangolare; Ovale; A paletta; Rotondo; Quadrato; A valigia; A lapide; Altro
hr-HR: Oblik štita za udarce: Zakrivljeno; Dvostruka palica; Ravno/pravokutno; Ovalno; Palica; Okruglo; Kvadratno; Kovčeg; Nadgrobni spomenik; Ostalo
fi: Potkutyynyn muoto: Kaareva; Kaksoislapa; Litteä/suorakulmainen; Soikea; Lapa; Pyöreä; Neliö; Salkku; Hautakivi; Muu
el: Σχήμα ασπίδας χτυπημάτων: Κυρτό; Διπλή ρακέτα (Paddle); Επίπεδο/Ορθογώνιο; Οβάλ; Ρακέτα (Paddle); Στρογγυλό; Τετράγωνο; Βαλίτσα; Ταφόπλακα; Άλλο
pt-BR: Escudo de impacto formato: Curvado; Raquete dupla; Plano/Retangular; Oval; Raquete; Redondo; Quadrado; Maleta; Lápide; Outro
fr: Forme du bouclier de frappe: Incurvé; Double raquette; Plat/rectangulaire; Ovale; Raquette; Rond; Carré; Valise; Pierre tombale; Autre
sl-SI: Oblika ščita za udarce: Curved; Dvojna tarča (paddle); Plosko/pravokotno; Ovalno; Tarča (paddle); Okroglo; Kvadratno; Oblika kovčka; Oblika nagrobnika; Drugo
zh-CN: 击打盾形状: 弯曲; 双桨型; 平/长方形; 椭圆形; 桨型; 圆形; 方形; 手提箱型; 墓碑型; 其他
vi: Hình dạng tấm chắn tấn công: Cong; Vợt kép; Phẳng/Chữ nhật; Bầu dục; Vợt; Tròn; Vuông; Hình vali; Hình bia mộ; Khác
ko: 스트라이크 쉴드 모양: 곡선형; 더블 패들; 평면/직사각형; 타원형; 패들; 원형; 정사각형; 수트케이스; 톰스톤; 기타
zh-TW: 手靶形狀: 弧形; 雙踢靶; 平/長方形; 橢圓形; 單踢靶; 圓形; 方形; 手提箱形; 墓碑形; 其他
sk-SK: Tvar ochranného štítu proti nárazom: Zakrivený; Dvojitá laba; Plochý/obdĺžnikový; Oválny; Laba; Okrúhly; Štvorcový; V tvare kufra; V tvare náhrobného kameňa; Iné
sv: Slagskyddets form: Böjd; Dubbelmits; Platt/rektangulär; Oval; Mits; Rund; Fyrkantig; Resväska; Gravsten; Övrigt
hu: Shapesalakzatok: Íves; Dupla lapát; Lapos/téglalap alakú; Ovális; Lapát; Kerek; Négyzet; Bőrönd; Sírkő; Egyéb
es: Forma del escudo de impacto: Curvo; Paleta doble; Plano/rectangular; Ovalado; Paleta; Redondo; Cuadrado; Maleta; Lápida; Otro
ro-RO: Formă a scutului de lovire: Curbat; Paletă dublă; Plat/Dreptunghiular; Oval; Paletă; Rotund; Pătrat; Tip valiză; Piatră funerară; Altele
pt-PT: Forma do escudo de impacto: Curvo; Raquete dupla; Plano/retangular; Oval; Raquete; Redondo; Quadrado; Mala; Em forma de lápide; Outro
bg-BG: Форма на защитния щит срещу удари: Извит; Двойна лапа; Плосък/правоъгълен; Овален; Лапа; Кръгъл; Квадратен; Тип куфар; Тип надгробна плоча; Друго
en: Strike shield shape: Curved; Double Paddle; Flat/Rectangular; Oval; Paddle; Round; Square; Suitcase; Tombstone; Other
ru: Форма ударного щита: Изогнутая; Двойная хлопушка (ракетка); Плоская/прямоугольная; Овальная; Ракетка (хлопушка); Круглая; Квадратная; Чемодан; В форме надгробия; Другое
nb: Form på slagskjold: Buet; Dobbel padle; Flat/rektangulær; Oval; Padle; Rund; Kvadratisk; Koffert; Gravstein; Annet
ja: ストライクシールド形状: カーブ; ダブルパドル; フラット/長方形; オーバル; パドル; ラウンド; スクエア; スーツケース; トゥームストーン; その他
tr: Darbe kalkanı şekli: Kavisli; Çift raket; Düz/dikdörtgen; Oval; Raket; Yuvarlak; Kare; Bavul; Mezar taşı; Diğer
cs: Tvar úderové plochy: Zahnutý; Dvojitá lapa; Plochý/obdélníkový; Oválný; Lapa; Kulatý; Čtvercový; Blok ve tvaru kufru; Blok tombstone; Jiné
nl: Stootschild vorm: Gebogen; Dubbele paddle; Plat/rechthoekig; Ovaal; Pad; Rond; Vierkant; Koffer; Grafsteen; Overig